Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
ESTABLISHMENT OF A MILK SHED AND THE

SETTING OF
MINIMUM PRICES AND QUOTAS

Note

Part heading amended by L 1971, c 184, §4.

§157-30 Petition to establish or terminate
a milk shed. Upon petition by fifty-five per cent of all producers and producer-distributors,
or by fifty-five per cent of all producers in a prospective milk shed, or upon
the board's own motion, the board shall hold a public hearing to establish or
terminate a milk shed in a county comprising one island or on one or more islands
or a portion of an island comprising a county. [L 1971, c 184, pt of §4; ree L
1972, c 40, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next